Wyoming, session 2026, SF0026.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xxxvi) and
39-13-103(b)(xii)(A)(intro) and (II) are amended to read:
39-11-105. Exemptions.
(a) The following property is exempt from property
taxation:
(xxxvi) Real property owned by the Wyoming game
and fish commission,. Nothing in this exemption affects
except for real property that is subject to the special tax
levied under W.S. 39-13-103(b)(xii) and that is:
(A) Used for wildlife management purposes,
in accordance with W.S. 39-13-103(b)(xii)(A)(I); or
(B) Furnished by the commission to
employees as a place of residence, in accordance with W.S.
39-13-103(b)(xii)(A)(II).
39-13-103. Imposition.
(b) Basis of tax. The following shall apply:
(xii) The following shall apply to special tax
imposed on property owned by the game and fish commission:
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0026
ENROLLED ACT NO. 35, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(A) There is imposed upon all real property
owned by the Wyoming game and fish commission and used for
wildlife management purposes or employee residences a
special tax computed as provided in this paragraph which
shall be in lieu of ad valorem property tax. The special
tax shall be determined as follows:
(II) For property used for any other
purpose employee residences, the tax shall be equal to the
amount of the ad valorem tax for that property had it been
levied and assessed based upon the taxable value of similar
property valued at fair market value as provided by
paragraph (b)(ii) of this section.
Section 2. Nothing in this act shall be deemed to
affect any tax assessment or collection before January 1,
2027.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0026
ENROLLED ACT NO. 35, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective January 1, 2027.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3